Ohio, session 136, SB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 107.38 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 107.38. (A) The statewide youth council is established in the office of the governor. The council shall advise the governor and the general assembly on legislation and issues that affect youth in the state. (B) The council shall annually, not later than the first day of March, submit to the governor, and to the general assembly under section 101.68 of the Revised Code, recommendations for policies to address issues that affect youth in the state. (C) The council may do both or either of the following: (1) Participate in legislative advocacy through lobbying the general assembly; (2) Seek public engagement and input with the goal of shaping public policy and recommending legislation to address issues that affect youth in the state. (D)(1) The council shall consist of twenty residents of this state who attend a school in this state, who are appointed by the governor. A student who wishes to serve on the council may submit an application to the office of the governor. The governor shall create an application form and make the form available on the internet web site of the office of the governor. Applications shall be submitted in a manner prescribed by the governor. Appointments to serve on the council shall be made by the first day of July before the start of the school year. (2) A student who will be at least fourteen years of age, but not more than eighteen years of age, upon the start of the upcoming school year may apply for a seat on the statewide youth council. (3) Not later than the first day of July following the effective date of this section, the governor shall appoint ten applicants to serve on the statewide youth council for a term of one school year and ten applicants to serve on the council for a term of two school years. Thereafter, annually, not later than the first day of July, the governor shall select ten applicants to serve a term of two school years. If a seat on the council is vacated, the governor shall appoint a replacement to serve the remainder of the term from among the most recent applicants. A seat on the council is automatically vacated upon the seat holder's withdrawal from school or graduation from high school. (E) The governor shall select an employee of the office of the governor to serve as chairperson of the council, who shall serve in a nonvoting capacity with respect to matters before the council. The council shall meet at least twice per month at the call of the chairperson. The council is a public body under section 121.221 of the Revised Code and may hold, and members may attend, meetings by means of video conference or any other similar electronic technology in accordance with that section. (F) A majority of the members of the council constitutes a quorum, and a majority vote of the participating members is necessary to advance a policy or approve an action to be undertaken by the council. (G) Members of the council are not entitled to compensation for service on the council but may be compensated for necessary and actual expenses in service of the council, provided that the chairperson of the council has approved expenses in advance.